Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Division of Federal-State Programs

§ 7-1-251.
Department of Finance and Administration to be Office of Governor, Division of Federal-State Programs.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall be the Office of the Governor, Division of Federal-State Programs and shall retain all powers and duties granted by law to the Office of the Governor, Division of Federal-State Programs, except for specific duties transferred to other departments under “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 [Law, 1989, Chapter 544]”. Wherever the term “Office of the Governor, Federal-State Programs” appears in any law the same shall mean the Department of Finance and Administration. The Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may assign to the appropriate division such powers and duties as deemed appropriate to carry out the lawful functions of this department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 340, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 325 § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-1-253.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§7-1-253. [En Laws, 1980, ch. 340, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 325, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 323, § 2]

§ 7-1-255.
Powers and duties of Department.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall have the following powers and duties with regard to federal-state programs:

Provide assistance to state departments, agencies and institutions in the development of federal programs and, whenever possible, to local agencies, so that the people of Mississippi can be assured of a fair, efficient and coordinated planning and administration of these programs. The department shall inform the Governor of the fiscal requirements of the state departments, agencies and institutions for these programs so that a comprehensive plan can be developed which will be responsive to state needs and priorities. The Department of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized to receive and expend funds that have been appropriated by the Legislature in accordance with law for coordinating federal programs and for providing technical assistance to state and local agencies administering those programs. All state departments, agencies and institutions shall cooperate with the department by providing information and assistance when requested.

The Department of Finance and Administration is hereby authorized to cooperate with or, with approval of the Governor, enter into any agreements with any agency, department, official, educational institution or political subdivision of this state, any agency or official of the government of the United States of America, or any private person for and on behalf of any delivery agency, in order to carry out the provisions of Section 7-1-251 et seq. The delivery of services for the programs known as “federal-state programs” shall be carried out by the state delivery agencies as assigned by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration, or as specified by law.

The department is hereby authorized, with the approval of the Governor, to charge reasonable application fees in the administration of the Federal Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Program established by Title II of the Tax Reform Act of 1986, P.L. 99-514. The department is further authorized and empowered to escalate its budget authority based on any such fees generated. In the event that the government of the state is reorganized so as to provide that an agency other than the department shall administer the Federal Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Program, the authority granted by this paragraph shall be transferred to such successor agency.

The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of Section 7-1-251 et seq., complying with the provisions of Section 25-43-1 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch 340, § 4, 5, 6; Laws, 1983, ch. 325, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 163; Laws, 1988, ch. 323, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-1-257.
Construction of references to office of Executive Director of Federal-State Programs.

Any reference to the office of the Executive Director of Federal-State Programs or to the Division of Federal-State Programs, Office of the Governor, in any statute or executive order shall be construed to mean the Department of Finance and Administration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 340, § 7; Laws, 1983, ch. 325, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 323, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 7-1-259.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1990, ch 522, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§7-1-259. [En Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 35; Am, Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 22]